District of Columbia statutes.
31-5006

Supervision and regulation of operations by Mayor.

The operation of any inspection bureau, the Industry Placement Facility, and the Joint Underwriting Association shall at all times be subject to the supervision and regulation of the Mayor. The Mayor shall have the power of visitation of and examination into such operations and free access to all the books, records, files, papers, and documents that relate to such operations, may summon and qualify witnesses under oath, and may examine directors, officers, agents, employees or any other person having knowledge of such operations.

Aug. 1, 1968, 82 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 90-448, title XII, § 1207

Delegation of functions: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5002.

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5002.

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 35-1706.
1981 Ed., § 35-1806.